Illinois, session 104th, HB686.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Revenue Recapture Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 355/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Local Government Revenue Recapture Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-628, eff. 6-1-20.)